Wyoming, session 2025, HB0289.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 35-2-906(a) is amended to read:
35-2-906. Construction and expansion of facilities;
exemption.
(a) A licensee who contemplates construction of or
alteration or addition to a health care facility shall
submit plans and specifications to the division for
preliminary inspection and approval prior to commencing
construction. Significant changes to the original plans
must also be submitted and approved prior to
implementation. The plans and any changes shall indicate
any increase in the number of beds. Information submitted
pursuant to this subsection shall be used by the division
only for purposes of health care and life safety compliance
determinations.
Section 2. W.S. 35-2-901(a)(v) and 35-2-906(b), (c),
(f) and (g) are repealed.
Section 3. On or before September 1, 2029, the
department of health shall report to the joint labor,
health and social services interim committee on the status
of construction of nursing care facilities and whether
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0289
ENROLLED ACT NO. 49, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
hospitals and nursing care facilities are positively or
adversely affected by this act.
Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2